Missouri, session 2026, SB1033.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 640.220, 643.315, and 643.350, RSMo,
are repealed and four new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to
be known as sections 640.220, 643.315, 643.350, and 643.675, to
read as follows:
640.220. 1. For the purpose of protecting the air,
water and land resources of the state, there is hereby
created in the state treasury a fund to be known as the
"Natural Resources Protection Fund". All funds received
from air pollution permit fees, gifts, bequests, donations,
or any other moneys so designated shall be paid to the
director of the department of natural resources, transmitted
to the director of revenue and deposited in the state
treasury to the credit of an appropriate subaccount of the
natural resources protection fund and shall be used for the
purposes specified by law. The air pollution permit fee
revenues shall be deposited in an appropriate subaccount of
the natural resources protection fund and, subject to
appropriation by the general assembly, shall be used by the
department to carry out the general administration of
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SS SB 1033 2
section 643.075. The water pollution permit fee revenues
generated through sections 644.052, 644.053, 644.054 and
644.061 shall be paid to the director of the department of
natural resources, transmitted to the director of the
department of revenue and deposited to the credit of the
water pollution permit fee subaccount of the natural
resources protection fund and, subject to appropriation by
the general assembly, shall be used by the department to
carry out the administration of sections 644.006 to 644.141.
2. Effective July 1, 1991, and before June 30, 2027,
the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary
notwithstanding, any unexpended balance in the subaccounts
of the natural resources protection fund that exceeds the
preceding biennium's collections shall revert to the general
revenue fund of the state at the end of each biennium.
Beginning July 1, 2027, any unexpended balance in the
subaccounts of the natural resources protection fund that
exceeds the preceding biennium's collections shall not
revert to the general revenue fund of the state at the end
of each biennium. All interest earned on the natural
resources protection funds shall accrue to appropriate
subaccounts.
3. Beginning July 1, 2027, and annually on July first
of each succeeding year, the commissioner of administration
shall use taxable sales reports to estimate the amount of
state general revenue sales and use tax derived from
electric power distribution (NAICS code 221122, or its
successor) in the immediately preceding calendar year and
shall report such amount to the state treasurer. The state
treasurer shall transfer five percent of such general
revenue sales and use taxes to the air pollution permit fees
subaccount of the natural resources protection fund and such

SS SB 1033 3
funds, subject to appropriation by the general assembly,
shall be used by the department solely for the purpose of
funding the air pollution control program. Any provision of
law to the contrary notwithstanding, amounts transferred in
accordance with this subsection shall not revert to the
general revenue fund of the state at the end of each
biennium and shall be used solely for the purpose of funding
the air pollution control program.
643.315. 1. Except as provided in sections 643.300 to
643.355, all motor vehicles which are domiciled, registered
or primarily operated in an area for which the commission
has established a motor vehicle emissions inspection program
pursuant to sections 643.300 to 643.355 shall be inspected
and approved prior to sale or transfer; provided that, if
such vehicle is inspected and approved prior to sale or
transfer, such vehicle shall not be subject to another
emissions inspection for ninety days after the date of sale
or transfer of such vehicle. In addition, any such vehicle
manufactured as an even-numbered model year vehicle shall be
inspected and approved under the emissions inspection
program established pursuant to sections 643.300 to 643.355
in each even-numbered calendar year and any such vehicle
manufactured as an odd-numbered model year vehicle shall be
inspected and approved under the emissions inspection
program established pursuant to sections 643.300 to 643.355
in each odd-numbered calendar year. All motor vehicles
subject to the inspection requirements of sections 643.300
to 643.355 shall display a valid emissions inspection
sticker, and when applicable, a valid emissions inspection
certificate shall be presented at the time of registration
or registration renewal of such motor vehicle. The
department of revenue shall require evidence of the safety

SS SB 1033 4
and emission inspection and approval required by this
section in issuing the motor vehicle annual registration in
conformity with the procedure required by sections 307.350
to 307.390 and sections 643.300 to 643.355. The director of
revenue may verify that a successful safety and emissions
inspection was completed via electronic means.
2. The inspection requirement of subsection 1 of this
section shall apply to all motor vehicles except:
(1) Motor vehicles with a manufacturer's gross vehicle
weight rating in excess of eight thousand five hundred
pounds;
(2) Motorcycles and motortricycles if such vehicles
are exempted from the motor vehicle emissions inspection
under federal regulation and approved by the commission by
rule;
(3) Model year vehicles manufactured prior to 1996;
(4) Vehicles which are powered exclusively by electric
or hydrogen power or by fuels other than gasoline which are
exempted from the motor vehicle emissions inspection under
federal regulation and approved by the commission by rule;
(5) Motor vehicles registered in an area subject to
the inspection requirements of sections 643.300 to 643.355
which are domiciled and operated exclusively in an area of
the state not subject to the inspection requirements of
sections 643.300 to 643.355, but only if the owner of such
vehicle presents to the department an affidavit that the
vehicle will be operated exclusively in an area of the state
not subject to the inspection requirements of sections
643.300 to 643.355 for the next twenty-four months, and the
owner applies for and receives a waiver which shall be
presented at the time of registration or registration
renewal;

SS SB 1033 5
(6) New and unused motor vehicles, of model years of
the current calendar year and of any calendar year within
two years of such calendar year, which have an odometer
reading of less than six thousand miles at the time of
original sale by a motor vehicle manufacturer or licensed
motor vehicle dealer to the first user;
(7) Historic motor vehicles registered pursuant to
section 301.131;
(8) School buses;
(9) Heavy-duty diesel-powered vehicles with a gross
vehicle weight rating in excess of eight thousand five
hundred pounds;
(10) New motor vehicles that have not been previously
titled and registered, for the four-year period following
their model year of manufacture, provided the odometer
reading for such motor vehicles are under forty thousand
miles at their first required biennial safety inspection
conducted under sections 307.350 to 307.390; otherwise such
motor vehicles shall be subject to the emissions inspection
requirements of subsection 1 of this section during the same
period that the biennial safety inspection is conducted;
(11) Motor vehicles that are driven fewer than twelve
thousand miles between biennial safety inspections; [and]
(12) Qualified plug-in electric drive vehicles. For
the purposes of this section, "qualified plug-in electric
drive vehicle" shall mean a plug-in electric drive vehicle
that is made by a manufacturer, has not been modified from
original manufacturer specifications, and can operate solely
on electric power and is capable of recharging its battery
from an on-board generation source and an off-board
electricity source; and

SS SB 1033 6
(13) Motor vehicles over ten years old that are
registered as local commercial motor vehicles used for farm
or farming transportation operations, as described in
section 301.010, or that are otherwise defined as covered
farm vehicles under federal laws and regulations.
3. The commission may, by rule, allow inspection
reciprocity with other states having equivalent or more
stringent testing and waiver requirements than those
established pursuant to sections 643.300 to 643.355.
4. (1) At the time of sale, a licensed motor vehicle
dealer, as defined in section 301.550, may choose to sell a
motor vehicle subject to the inspection requirements of
100 sections 643.300 to 643.355 either:
101 (a) With prior inspection and approval as provided in
102 subdivision (2) of this subsection; or
103 (b) Without prior inspection and approval as provided
104 in subdivision (3) of this subsection.
105 (2) If the dealer chooses to sell the vehicle with
106 prior inspection and approval, the dealer shall disclose, in
107 writing, prior to sale, whether the vehicle obtained
108 approval by meeting the emissions standards established
109 pursuant to sections 643.300 to 643.355 or by obtaining a
110 waiver pursuant to section 643.335. A vehicle sold pursuant
111 to this subdivision by a licensed motor vehicle dealer shall
112 be inspected and approved within the one hundred twenty days
113 immediately preceding the date of sale, and, for the purpose
114 of registration of such vehicle, such inspection shall be
115 considered timely.
116 (3) If the dealer chooses to sell the vehicle without
117 prior inspection and approval, the purchaser may return the
118 vehicle within ten days of the date of purchase, provided
119 that the vehicle has no more than one thousand additional

SS SB 1033 7
120 miles since the time of sale, if the vehicle fails, upon
121 inspection, to meet the emissions standards specified by the
122 commission and the dealer shall have the vehicle inspected
123 and approved without the option for a waiver of the
124 emissions standard and return the vehicle to the purchaser
125 with a valid emissions certificate and sticker within five
126 working days or the purchaser and dealer may enter into any
127 other mutually acceptable agreement. If the dealer chooses
128 to sell the vehicle without prior inspection and approval,
129 the dealer shall disclose conspicuously on the sales
130 contract and bill of sale that the purchaser has the option
131 to return the vehicle within ten days, provided that the
132 vehicle has no more than one thousand additional miles since
133 the time of sale, to have the dealer repair the vehicle and
134 provide an emissions certificate and sticker within five
135 working days if the vehicle fails, upon inspection, to meet
136 the emissions standards established by the commission, or
137 enter into any mutually acceptable agreement with the
138 dealer. A violation of this subdivision shall be an
139 unlawful practice as defined in section 407.020. No
140 emissions inspection shall be required pursuant to sections
141 643.300 to 643.360 for the sale of any motor vehicle which
142 may be sold without a certificate of inspection and
143 approval, as provided pursuant to subsection 2 of section
144 307.380.
643.350. 1. A fee, not to exceed twenty-four dollars,
may be charged for an emissions inspection conducted under
the emissions inspection program established pursuant to
sections 643.300 to 643.355.
2. The fee shall be conspicuously posted on the
premises of each emissions inspection station.

SS SB 1033 8
3. The commission shall establish, by rule, the
portion of the fee amount to be remitted by the emission
inspection station to the director of revenue and the number
of days allowed for remitting fees.
4. The official emission inspection station shall
remit the portion of fees collected, as established by the
commission pursuant to this section, to the state treasurer
within the time period established by the commission. The
state treasurer shall deposit the fees received in the state
treasury to the credit of the "Missouri Air Emission
Reduction Fund", which is hereby created. Moneys in the
fund shall, subject to appropriation, be expended for the
administration and enforcement of sections 643.300 to
643.355 by the department of natural resources, the Missouri
highway patrol, and other appropriate agencies. Any balance
in the fund at the end of the biennium shall remain in the
fund and shall not be subject to the provisions of section
33.080. All interest earned by moneys in the fund shall
accrue to the fund. [If in the immediate previous fiscal
year, the state's net general revenue did not increase by
two percent or more, the state treasurer may deposit moneys,
except for gifts, donations, or bequests, received under
this section beginning January first of the current fiscal
year into the state general revenue fund. Otherwise, the
state treasurer shall deposit such moneys in accordance with
the provisions of this section.]
5. In addition to funds from the Missouri air emission
reduction fund, costs of capital or operations may be
supplemented, upon appropriation, from the general revenue
fund, the state highway department fund, federal funds or
other funds available for that purpose.

SS SB 1033 9
643.675. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Air dispersion modeling", the process of
simulating particle matter dispersion from an emission point
to help predict downwind concentrations to ensure compliance
with air quality standards, considering factors like wind,
terrain, and building effects, in order to assess health
impacts and manage pollution;
(2) "Cotton gin", a machine that separates cotton
fibers from cotton seeds;
(3) "Department", the Missouri department of natural
resources.
2. Notwithstanding any law, rule, order, decision,
permit, agreement, or other relevant authority to the
contrary, an owner or operator of a cotton gin that is not a
class A source, as defined in section 643.020, shall not be
required to submit air dispersion modeling to the department
in order to obtain a construction permit for the cotton gin.
✓